Hawaii statutes.
§412:2-101 Deputy commissioner, acting
commissioner. The deputy commissioner shall have such duties as are
assigned by the commissioner from time to time, and shall serve as acting
commissioner whenever the commissioner is out of the State or is otherwise
incapable of performing the commissioner's duties. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next